Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.050

Fund distribution for attorneys appointed for indigent tenants.

(1) Moneys appropriated by the legislature for legal services provided by an attorney appointed pursuant to RCW 59.18.640 must be administered by the office of civil legal aid established under RCW 2.53.020. The office of civil legal aid must enter into contracts with attorneys and agencies for the provision of legal services under RCW 59.18.640 to remain within appropriated amounts.

(2) The legislature recognizes that the office of civil legal aid needs time to properly implement the right to attorney legal representation for indigent tenants under and consistent with RCW 59.18.640. Within 90 days after April 22, 2021, the office of civil legal aid must submit to the appropriate legislative committees a plan to fully implement the tenant representation program under and consistent with RCW 59.18.640 within 12 months of April 22, 2021.

[ 2021 c 115 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Application—Effective date—2021 c 115: See notes following RCW 59.18.620.